Washington statutes.
RCW 12.40.800

Small claims informational brochure—Preparation and distribution.

The administrator for the courts and the district and municipal court judges' association shall prepare a model small claims informational brochure and distribute the model brochure to all small claims departments in the state. This brochure may be modified as necessary by each small claims department and shall be made available to all parties in any small claims action.

[ 1994 c 32 s 7; 1988 c 85 s 3.]